Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 7973. BIG SKY MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT OF DENTON COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 7973.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Big Sky Municipal Utility District of Denton County.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 787 (H.B. 2565), Sec. 1.01, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 7973.002. NATURE AND PURPOSES OF DISTRICT. (a) The district is a municipal utility district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(b) The district is created to accomplish the purposes of:

(1) a municipal utility district as provided by general law and Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution; and

(2) Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, that relate to the construction, acquisition, improvement, operation, or maintenance of macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements, including storm drainage, in aid of those roads.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 787 (H.B. 2565), Sec. 1.01, eff. June 15, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 7973.051. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties necessary to accomplish the purposes for which the district is created.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 787 (H.B. 2565), Sec. 1.01, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 7973.052. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, applicable to municipal utility districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 787 (H.B. 2565), Sec. 1.01, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 7973.053. AUTHORITY FOR ROAD PROJECTS. Under Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, the district may design, acquire, construct, finance, issue bonds for, improve, operate, maintain, and convey to this state, a county, or a municipality for operation and maintenance macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements, including storm drainage, in aid of those roads.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 787 (H.B. 2565), Sec. 1.01, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 7973.054. ROAD STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS. (a) A road project must meet all applicable construction standards and regulations of each municipality in whose corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the road project is located.

(b) If a road project is not located in the corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality, the road project must meet all applicable construction standards and regulations of each county in which the road project is located.

(c) If the state will maintain and operate the road, the Texas Transportation Commission must approve the plans and specifications of the road project.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 787 (H.B. 2565), Sec. 1.01, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 7973.055. FIREFIGHTING SERVICES. Notwithstanding Section 49.351(a), Water Code, the district may, as authorized by Section 59(f), Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and Section 49.351, Water Code:

(1) establish, operate, and maintain a fire department;

(2) contract with another political subdivision for the joint operation of a fire department; or

(3) contract with any other person to perform firefighting services in the district and may issue bonds and impose taxes to pay for the department and the activities.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 787 (H.B. 2565), Sec. 1.01, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 7973.056. FEES AND CHARGES. (a) The district may adopt and enforce all necessary charges, mandatory fees, or rentals, in addition to taxes, for providing or making available any district facility or service, including firefighting activities provided under Section 7973.055.

(b) To enforce payment of an unpaid fee or charge due to the district, on the request of the district, a retail public utility, as defined by Section 13.002, Water Code, providing water or sewer service to a customer in the district shall terminate the service.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 787 (H.B. 2565), Sec. 1.01, eff. June 15, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER C. BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS

Sec. 7973.101. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS FOR ROAD PROJECTS. (a) In addition to the district's authority to issue bonds for other purposes, the district may issue bonds or other obligations payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, revenue, contract payments, grants, or other district money, or any combination of those sources, to pay for a road project authorized by Section 7973.053.

(b) The district may not issue bonds payable from ad valorem taxes to finance a road project unless the issuance is approved by a vote of a two-thirds majority of the district voters voting at an election held for that purpose.

(c) At the time of issuance, the total principal amount of bonds or other obligations issued or incurred to finance road projects and payable from ad valorem taxes may not exceed one-fourth of the assessed value of the real property in the district.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 787 (H.B. 2565), Sec. 1.01, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 7973.102. TAXES FOR BONDS. At the time the district issues bonds payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, the district shall provide for the annual imposition of a continuing direct ad valorem tax, without limit as to rate or amount, while all or part of the bonds are outstanding.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 787 (H.B. 2565), Sec. 1.01, eff. June 15, 2017.